Washington statutes.
RCW 2.24.010

Appointment of court commissioners, criminal commissioners—Qualifications—Term of office.

(1) There may be appointed in each county or judicial district, by the judges of the superior court having jurisdiction therein or a presiding judge pro tempore who is fulfilling presiding judge duties for a single judge court pursuant to RCW 2.08.120(2), one or more court commissioners for said county or judicial district. Each such commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and shall hold the office during the pleasure of the judges making the appointment.

(2)(a) There may be appointed in counties with a population of more than four hundred thousand, by the presiding judge of the superior court having jurisdiction therein, one or more attorneys to act as criminal commissioners to assist the superior court in disposing of adult criminal cases. Such criminal commissioners shall have power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the superior court and the judges thereof, in adult criminal cases, to preside over arraignments, preliminary appearances, initial extradition hearings, and noncompliance proceedings pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6333 or 9.94B.040; accept pleas if authorized by local court rules; appoint counsel; make determinations of probable cause; set, amend, and review conditions of pretrial release; set bail; set trial and hearing dates; authorize continuances; accept waivers of the right to speedy trial; and authorize and issue search warrants and orders to intercept, monitor, or record wired or wireless telecommunications or for the installation of electronic taps or other devices to include, but not be limited to, vehicle global positioning system or other mobile tracking devices with all the powers conferred upon the judge of the superior court in such matters.

(b) Criminal commissioners shall also have the authority to conduct resentencing hearings and to vacate convictions related to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021). Criminal commissioners may be appointed for this purpose regardless of the population of the county served by the appointing court.

(c) The county legislative authority must approve the creation of criminal commissioner positions.

[ 2022 c 74 s 4; 2021 c 311 s 17; 2013 c 27 s 3; 2009 c 140 s 1; 1990 c 191 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 54 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 87 s 1; 1961 c 42 s 1; 1909 c 124 s 1; RRS s 83. Prior: 1895 c 83 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 311 ss 1-11 and 13-21: See note following RCW 71.24.115.